Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.52.220

No nonpartisan office primary permitted—Procedure—No primary for the office of commissioner of park and recreation district, office of cemetery district commissioner—Names of candidates.

(1) No primary may be held for any single position in any nonpartisan office if, after the last day allowed for candidates to withdraw, there are no more than two candidates filed for the position. The county auditor shall as soon as possible notify all the candidates so affected that the office for which they filed will not appear on the primary ballot.

(2) No primary may be held for the office of commissioner of a park and recreation district or for the office of cemetery district commissioner.

(3) Names of candidates for offices that do not appear on the primary ballot shall be printed upon the general election ballot in the manner specified by RCW 29A.36.131.

[ 2013 c 195 s 1; 2005 c 153 s 10; 2003 c 111 s 1306. Prior: 1998 c 19 s 1; 1996 c 324 s 1; 1990 c 59 s 90; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 120 s 2; 1965 c 9 s 29.21.015; prior: 1955 c 101 s 2; 1955 c 4 s 1. Formerly RCW 29.21.015.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2013 c 195: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 10, 2013]." [ 2013 c 195 s 3.]

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 120: See note following RCW 29A.52.210.